bg-BG: Тип входяща връзка: BNC; Компонентно видео (YPbPr); Композитно видео (RCA); DC цилиндричен жак; DVI; DisplayPort; HDMI; Оптичен (TOSLINK); RCA; RJ45; RS232; RS485; SDI; SMA; Thunderbolt; USB type-A; USB Type-C; VGA; XLR; Други
hu: Bemeneti csatlakozás típusa: BNC; Komponens videó (YPbPr); Kompozit videó (RCA); DC hengeres csatlakozó; DVI; DisplayPort; HDMI; Optikai (TOSLINK); RCA; RJ45; RS232; RS485; SDI; SMA; Thunderbolt; USB-A; USB-C; VGA; XLR; Egyéb
pt-BR: Tipo de conexão de entrada: BNC; Vídeo componente (YPbPr); Vídeo composto (RCA); Conector DC cilíndrico; DVI; DisplayPort; HDMI; Óptico (TOSLINK); RCA; RJ45; RS232; RS485; SDI; SMA; Thunderbolt; USB tipo A; USB tipo C; VGA; XLR; Outro
ja: 入力接続タイプ: BNC; コンポーネントビデオ（YPbPr）; コンポジットビデオ（RCA）; DCバレルジャック; DVI; DisplayPort; HDMI; 光（TOSLINK）; RCA; RJ45; RS232; RS485; SDI; SMA; Thunderbolt; USB Type-A; USB Type-C; VGA; XLR; その他
pl: Typ połączenia wejściowego: BNC; Wideo komponentowe (YPbPr); Wideo kompozytowe (RCA); Gniazdo DC typu barrel; DVI; DisplayPort; HDMI; Optyczne (TOSLINK); RCA; RJ45; RS232; RS485; SDI; SMA; Thunderbolt; USB typu A; USB typu C; VGA; XLR; Inne
ru: Тип входного соединения: BNC; Компонентное видео (YPbPr); Композитное видео (RCA); Разъем питания DC; DVI; DisplayPort; HDMI; Оптический (TOSLINK); RCA; RJ45; RS232; RS485; SDI; SMA; Thunderbolt; USB Type-A; USB Type-C; VGA; XLR; Другой
th: ประเภทการเชื่อมต่อขาเข้า: BNC; คอมโพเนนต์วิดีโอ (YPbPr); คอมโพสิตวิดีโอ (RCA); แจ็คบาร์เรล DC; DVI; DisplayPort; HDMI; ออปติคัล (TOSLINK); RCA; RJ45; RS232; RS485; SDI; SMA; Thunderbolt; USB Type-A; USB Type-C; VGA; XLR; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 輸入連接類型: BNC; 色差視訊（YPbPr）; 複合視訊（RCA）; DC 圓筒插孔; DVI; DisplayPort; HDMI; 光纖（TOSLINK）; RCA; RJ45; RS232; RS485; SDI; SMA; Thunderbolt; USB Type-A; USB Type-C; VGA; XLR; 其他
en: Input connection type: BNC; Component video (YPbPr); Composite video (RCA); DC barrel jack; DVI; DisplayPort; HDMI; Optical (TOSLINK); RCA; RJ45; RS232; RS485; SDI; SMA; Thunderbolt; USB Type-A; USB Type-C; VGA; XLR; Other
pt-PT: Tipo de ligação de entrada: BNC; Vídeo componente (YPbPr); Vídeo composto (RCA); Ficha DC cilíndrica; DVI; DisplayPort; HDMI; Ótico (TOSLINK); RCA; RJ45; RS232; RS485; SDI; SMA; Thunderbolt; USB tipo A; USB tipo C; VGA; XLR; Outro
sk-SK: Typ vstupného pripojenia: BNC; Komponentné video (YPbPr); Kompozitné video (RCA); DC valcový konektor; DVI; DisplayPort; HDMI; Optický (TOSLINK); RCA; RJ45; RS232; RS485; SDI; SMA; Thunderbolt; USB typu A; USB typu C; VGA; XLR; Iné
tr: Giriş bağlantı tipi: BNC; Komponent video (YPbPr); Kompozit video (RCA); DC varil jak; DVI; DisplayPort; HDMI; Optik (TOSLINK); RCA; RJ45; RS232; RS485; SDI; SMA; Thunderbolt; USB Tip-A; USB Tip-C; VGA; XLR; Diğer
vi: Loại kết nối đầu vào: BNC; Video thành phần (YPbPr); Video composite (RCA); Jack nguồn DC; DVI; DisplayPort; HDMI; Quang học (TOSLINK); RCA; RJ45; RS232; RS485; SDI; SMA; Thunderbolt; USB Type-A; USB Type-C; VGA; XLR; Khác
ko: 입력 연결 유형: BNC; 컴포넌트 비디오 (YPbPr); 컴포지트 비디오 (RCA); DC 배럴 잭; DVI; 디스플레이포트; HDMI; 광 (TOSLINK); RCA; RJ45; RS232; RS485; SDI; SMA; 썬더볼트; USB 타입-A; USB 타입-C; VGA; XLR; 기타
nl: Type ingangsverbinding: BNC; Component video (YPbPr); Composiet video (RCA); DC barrel jack; DVI; DisplayPort; HDMI; Optisch (TOSLINK); RCA; RJ45; RS232; RS485; SDI; SMA; Thunderbolt; USB Type-A; USB Type-C; VGA; XLR; Andere
de: Eingangsanschlusstyp: BNC; Component-Video (YPbPr); Composite-Video (RCA); DC-Hohlstecker; DVI; DisplayPort; HDMI; Optisch (TOSLINK); RCA; RJ45; RS232; RS485; SDI; SMA; Thunderbolt; USB-Typ-A; USB-Typ-C; VGA; XLR; Sonstiges
fi: Tuloliitäntätyyppi: BNC; Komponenttivideo (YPbPr); Komposiittivideo (RCA); DC-liitin; DVI; DisplayPort; HDMI; Optinen (TOSLINK); RCA; RJ45; RS232; RS485; SDI; SMA; Thunderbolt; USB type-A; USB type-C; VGA; XLR; Muu
nb: Inngangstilkoblingstype: BNC; Komponentvideo (YPbPr); Komposittvideo (RCA); DC-plugg; DVI; DisplayPort; HDMI; Optisk (TOSLINK); RCA; RJ45; RS232; RS485; SDI; SMA; Thunderbolt; USB Type-A; USB Type-C; VGA; XLR; Annet
da: Indgangsforbindelsestype: BNC; Komponentvideo (YPbPr); Kompositvideo (RCA); DC-tønde-stik; DVI; DisplayPort; HDMI; Optisk (TOSLINK); RCA; RJ45; RS232; RS485; SDI; SMA; Thunderbolt; USB Type-A; USB Type-C; VGA; XLR; Andet
es: Tipo de conexión de entrada: BNC; Video por componentes (YPbPr); Video compuesto (RCA); Conector de barril CC; DVI; DisplayPort; HDMI; Óptico (TOSLINK); RCA; RJ45; RS232; RS485; SDI; SMA; Thunderbolt; USB tipo A; USB tipo C; VGA; XLR; Otros
cs: Typ vstupního připojení: BNC; Komponentní video (YPbPr); Kompozitní video (RCA); DC napájecí konektor; DVI; DisplayPort; HDMI; Optický (TOSLINK); RCA; RJ45; RS232; RS485; SDI; SMA; Thunderbolt; USB typ A; USB typ C; VGA; XLR; Jiné
lt-LT: Įėjimo jungties tipas: BNC; Komponentinis vaizdo (YPbPr); Kompozitinis vaizdo (RCA); DC cilindrinė jungtis; DVI; DisplayPort; HDMI; Optinis (TOSLINK); RCA; RJ45; RS232; RS485; SDI; SMA; „Thunderbolt“; USB A tipo; USB C tipo; VGA; XLR; Kita
el: Τύπος σύνδεσης εισόδου: BNC; Βίντεο συνιστωσών (YPbPr); Σύνθετο βίντεο (RCA); Βύσμα τροφοδοσίας DC; DVI; DisplayPort; HDMI; Οπτική (TOSLINK); RCA; RJ45; RS232; RS485; SDI; SMA; Thunderbolt; USB Type-A; USB Type-C; VGA; XLR; Άλλο
ro-RO: Tip de conexiune de intrare: BNC; Video component (YPbPr); Video compozit (RCA); Jack DC cilindric; DVI; DisplayPort; HDMI; Optic (TOSLINK); RCA; RJ45; RS232; RS485; SDI; SMA; Thunderbolt; USB tip A; USB tip C; VGA; XLR; Altele
hr-HR: Tip ulazne veze: BNC; Komponentni video (YPbPr); Kompozitni video (RCA); DC barel konektor; DVI; DisplayPort; HDMI; Optički (TOSLINK); RCA; RJ45; RS232; RS485; SDI; SMA; Thunderbolt; USB tip-A; USB tip-C; VGA; XLR; Ostalo
sv: Typ av ingångsanslutning: BNC; Komponentvideo (YPbPr); Kompositvideo (RCA); DC-rundkontakt; DVI; DisplayPort; HDMI; Optisk (TOSLINK); RCA; RJ45; RS232; RS485; SDI; SMA; Thunderbolt; USB typ-A; USB typ-C; VGA; XLR; Övrigt
sl-SI: Tip vhodne povezave: BNC; Komponentni video (YPbPr); Kompozitni video (RCA); DC sodčkasti priključek; DVI; DisplayPort; HDMI; Optični (TOSLINK); RCA; RJ45; RS232; RS485; SDI; SMA; Thunderbolt; USB tip-A; USB tipa C; VGA; XLR; Drugo
it: Tipo di connessione di ingresso: BNC; Video component (YPbPr); Video composito (RCA); Jack cilindrico DC; DVI; DisplayPort; HDMI; Ottico (TOSLINK); RCA; RJ45; RS232; RS485; SDI; SMA; Thunderbolt; USB tipo A; USB tipo C; VGA; XLR; Altro
zh-CN: 输入连接类型: BNC; 分量视频 (YPbPr); 复合视频 (RCA); DC 圆形插孔; DVI; DisplayPort; HDMI; 光纤 (TOSLINK); RCA; RJ45; RS232; RS485; SDI; SMA; 雷电接口; USB A 型; USB C 型; VGA; XLR; 其他
fr: Type de connexion d’entrée: BNC; Vidéo composantes (YPbPr); Vidéo composite (RCA); Prise d'alimentation CC; DVI; DisplayPort; HDMI; Optique (TOSLINK); RCA; RJ45; RS232; RS485; SDI; SMA; Thunderbolt; USB type A; USB type C; VGA; XLR; Autre